Utah statutes.
31A-37a-105.   Transition.

(1) (a)  Except as otherwise determined by the commissioner, a captive insurance company that on May 5, 2008 has a certificate of authority from the commissioner pursuant to Chapter 37, Captive Insurance Companies Act, and engages in insurance securitization:

(i)  is subject to this chapter as a special purpose financial captive insurance company; and

(ii)  is considered to have a certificate of authority issued under this chapter.

(b)  The commissioner may require a captive insurance company described in Subsection (1)(a) to take an action that the commissioner determines is reasonably necessary to bring the captive insurance company into compliance with this chapter.

(2)  The commissioner may issue an order described in Section 31A-37a-201 with respect to a captive insurance company described in Subsection (1)(a) if the captive insurance company is not in compliance with this chapter.

